Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 3
BONDS - BUILDINGS, ROADS, OTHER

30-26-301. Creation of debt for buildings, roads - election - definitions.

When the board of county commissioners of any county deems it necessary to create an indebtedness for the purpose of erecting necessary public buildings, making or repairing public roads or bridges, developing, maintaining, and operating mass transportation systems, acquiring or building or acquiring and building airports and landing strips including the necessary land therefor and approaches thereto, by an order entered of record specifying the amount required and the object for which such debt is created, they shall submit the question to a vote at a general or special election. The general or special election provided for under this part 3 may be combined with the election on a proposal for a countywide sales tax, use tax, or both, provided for in article 2 of title 29, C.R.S. The board shall cause to be posted a notice of such order, which states, among other things, the maximum net effective interest rate at which such bonds may be issued, in some conspicuous place in each voting precinct in the county, for at least thirty days preceding the election, and all persons voting on that question shall vote by separate ballot whereon are placed the words "for county indebtedness" or "against county indebtedness", such ballots to be deposited in a box provided by the board of county commissioners for that purpose.

No county shall contract any debt by loan in any form unless the proposition to create such debt shall first be submitted to and approved by the registered qualified electors of the county.

If a majority of those electors of the county voting at such election vote in favor of the proposition to contract said debt, the board of county commissioners is authorized to contract said debt.

The board of county commissioners of any county shall submit to the registered qualified electors of the county the question of contracting a bonded indebtedness for any one or more of the purposes authorized by law. As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires, "registered qualified elector" means a person who is legally qualified to register to vote in this state and in the county wherein his vote is offered and who has complied with the registration provisions of the "Uniform Election Code of 1992".

The order submitting the question of contracting an indebtedness shall contain a statement of the maximum net effective interest rate at which said indebtedness may be incurred. As used in articles 11, 15, and 17, parts 1, 3 to 6, and 8 of article 20, articles 25 and 26, and part 2 of article 28 of this title 30 and part 2 of article 6 of title 25, article 3 of title 29, part 5 of article 15 of this title 30, and article 5 of title 41, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Net effective interest rate" of a proposed issue of bonds means the net interest cost of said issue divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amount of such issue maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from the date of said proposed bonds to their respective maturities.

"Net interest cost" of a proposed issue of bonds means the total amount of interest to accrue on said bonds from their date of issuance to their respective maturities, plus the amount of any discount below par or less the amount of any premium above par at which said bonds are being or have been sold. In all cases the net effective interest rate and net interest cost shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the bonds.

The board of county commissioners of any county, having received approval at an election to issue bonds and having determined that the limitations of the original election question are too restrictive to permit the advantageous sale of the bonds so authorized, may submit at another general or special election either the question of issuing the bonds, or any portion thereof, at a higher maximum net effective interest rate than the maximum interest rate or maximum net effective interest rate approved at the original election, or the question of issuing the bonds, or any portion thereof, to mature over a longer period of time than the maximum period of maturity approved at the original election, or both such questions.

An election held pursuant to this paragraph (e) shall be held in substantially the same manner as an election to authorize bonds initially, except as may be required for the submission of the limited question or questions permitted under this paragraph (e).

If the changes submitted are not approved at an election held pursuant to this paragraph (e), such result shall not impair the authority of the board at a later time to issue the bonds originally approved within the limitations established at the first election.

If, upon canvassing the vote, which shall be canvassed in the same manner as the vote for county officers, it appears that a majority of all the votes cast are for county indebtedness, the board of county commissioners shall be authorized to contract the debt in the name of the county. The aggregate amount of indebtedness of any county shall not be in excess of three percent of the actual value, as determined by the assessor, of the taxable property in the county.

Source:

G.L.

§ 448.

G.S.

§ 671.

R.S. 08:

§ 1364.

C.L.

§ 8842.

CSA:

C. 45, § 194.

L. 45:

p. 296, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 36-6-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-6-1.

L. 70:

p. 137, §§ 3, 4.

L. 71:

pp. 336, 337, §§ 1, 7.

L. 73:

pp. 467, 469, §§ 3, 1.

L. 79:

(1), (2)(e)(I), and (3) amended, p. 1157, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 80:

(2)(c) amended, p. 414, § 20, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 81:

IP(2)(d) amended, p. 1614, § 13, effective June 19.

L. 92:

(2)(c) amended, p. 874, § 102, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 655, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2017:

IP(2)(d) amended, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1042, § 7, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For the manner of canvassing votes for county officers, see part 1 of article 10 of title 1; for the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", see articles 1 to 13 of title 1.

30-26-302. Bond issue - limitation - interest - redemption.

The board of county commissioners, when authorized as provided in section 30-26-301, may make and issue coupon bonds of the county not exceeding the amounts authorized by the electors, payable at the pleasure of the county but absolutely due and payable twenty years after such date, bearing interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, payable annually or semiannually; such interest and principal, when due, shall be payable at the office of the county treasurer of the county or at such other location as the board of county commissioners may designate. The board of county commissioners shall prescribe the form of said bonds and the coupons thereto; and, to provide for the principal and interest and redemption premiums accruing on the bonds, it shall provide for the levying of a tax which, together with such other revenue, assets, or funds as may be pledged, will be sufficient to pay the principal, interest and redemption premiums, if any, accruing on the bonds.

Source:

G.L.

§ 449.

G.S.

§ 672.

L. 1889:

p. 103, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1365.

C.L.

§ 8843.

CSA:

C. 45, § 195.

CRS 53:

§ 36-6-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-6-2.

L. 70:

p. 139, § 5.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1158, § 2, effective May 4.

30-26-303. Redemption - notice - interest - order of payment.

When it appears to the board of county commissioners upon examination of the books and accounts of the county treasurer that there are sufficient funds in his hands to the credit of the redemption fund to pay in full the principal and accrued interest of any of such bonds, it is the duty of such board immediately to call in and pay as many of such bonds and accrued interest thereon as the funds ascertained to be on hand will liquidate, and said board shall thereupon cancel such redeemed bonds and all uncanceled interest coupons issued therewith. The bonds shall be called in and paid in the order of their issuance, as nearly as may be practicable, and when it is desired to redeem any of such bonds by said board it shall cause to be published for thirty days in some newspaper at or nearest the county seat of the county a notice that certain county bonds, specifying the number and amounts, will be paid upon presentation, and at the expiration of such thirty days such bonds shall cease to bear interest.

Source:

G.L.

§ 450.

G.S.

§ 673.

R.S. 08:

§ 1366.

C.L.

§ 8844.

CSA:

C. 45, § 196.

CRS 53:

§ 36-6-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-6-3.

Cross references:

For clarification of terms and requirements for notice by publication, see part 1 of article 70 of title 24.

30-26-304. Bonds - signed - attested - sealed - denomination - amount.

The bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the board of county commissioners and attested by the county clerk and recorder and bear the seal of the county upon each bond and shall be numbered and registered in a book kept for that purpose in the order in which they are issued. Each bond shall state upon its face the amount for which the same is issued, to whom issued, and the date of its issuance; but no bond shall be of a lesser denomination than fifty dollars, and, if issued for a greater amount, for some multiple of that sum; and the aggregate amount of such bonds issued shall not exceed the sum entered of record by the board of county commissioners, and any bond issued in excess of said sum shall be null and void.

Source:

G.L.

§ 451.

G.S.

§ 674.

R.S. 08:

§ 1367.

C.L.

§ 8845.

CSA:

C. 45, § 197.

CRS 53:

§ 36-6-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-6-4.

30-26-305. Sale of bonds - rate - redemption - cancellation.

The board of county commissioners has the right to sell any of such bonds, but no bond shall be sold unless for cash, and not then at a discount of more than fifteen percent of its par value. The money arising from the sale of such bonds shall be forthwith used for the objects for which the debt was created, and for no other purpose whatever. When any such bonds or any coupons are redeemed, the board of county commissioners, in the presence of the clerk of said board or his deputy, shall cancel such bonds or coupons by writing the word "canceled" on the face of such bonds or coupons, and such board shall make a record of the proceedings, stating what bonds or coupons were canceled.

Source:

G.L.

§ 452.

G.S.

§ 675.

R.S. 08:

§ 1368.

C.L.

§ 8846.

CSA:

C. 45, § 198.

CRS 53:

§ 36-6-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-6-5.